apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="fortreng/e__vblex_adj" c="-er/-de/-t; LR fortrenge; NPK prefers fortrengje">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jande</l> <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>ande</l> <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l>     <r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l></l>      <r>e</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jast</l>  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>ast</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jer</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e c="v:"><p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/><par n="v:tenkje-leggje.kons-kj2k_gj2g"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sk/ave__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>aven</l>   <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ava</l>   <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aven</l>  <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ava</l>   <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>   <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avi</l>   <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ava</l>   <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avne</l>  <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ava</l>   <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avne</l>  <r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avande</l><r>ave<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ava</l>   <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ave</l>   <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>av</l>    <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>av</l><r>ave</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avast</l> <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ava</l>   <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ave</l>   <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>avi</l>   <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>avar</l>  <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>jev</l>   <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ava</l>   <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ov</l>    <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fort/eie__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>   <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>agd</l>   <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>   <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>  <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>  <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiande</l><r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ei</l>    <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ei</l><r>eie</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiast</l> <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>   <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>agt</l>   <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eier</l>  <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>  <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="skave"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ave__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fortrenge">      <i>fortreng</i>    <par n="fortreng/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forvrenge">      <i>forvreng</i>    <par n="fortreng/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forynge">        <i>foryng</i>      <par n="fortreng/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="trenge inn">     <i>treng</i>       <par n="fortreng/e__vblex_adj"/> <ig><b/>inn</ig></e>
<e lm="trenge på seg">  <i>treng</i>       <par n="fortreng/e__vblex_adj"/> <ig><b/>på<b/>seg</ig></e>
<e lm="trenge seg på">  <i>treng</i>       <par n="fortreng/e__vblex_adj"/> <ig><b/>seg<b/>på</ig></e>
<e lm="forteie"><i>fort</i><par n="fort/eie__vblex_adj"/></e>
